Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.180

Payments on death of unretired members.

Upon the death of any person who has not been retired, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, there shall be paid to his or her estate, or to such persons having an insurable interest in his or her life as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board, his or her accumulated contributions less any payments therefrom already made to him or her, if any.

[ 2012 c 117 s 55; 1939 c 207 s 19; RRS s 9592-119.]